New Jersey, session 221, A5044.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1968, c.285 (C.40:27-6.1) is amended to read as follows: As used in this act and in chapter 27 of Title 40 of the Revised Statutes, unless the context otherwise requires: "County master plan" and "master plan" means a composite of the master plan for the physical development of the county, with the accompanying maps, plats, charts and descriptive and explanatory matter adopted by the county planning board pursuant to Revised Statutes 40:27-2; "County planning board" means a county planning board established by a county pursuant to R.S. 40:27-1 to exercise the duties set forth in such chapter, and means, in any county having adopted the provisions of the "Optional County Charter Law" (P.L.1972, c. 154; C.40:41A-1 et seq.), any department, division, board or agency established pursuant to the administrative code of such county to exercise such duties, but only to the degree and extent that the requirements specified in such chapter for county planning boards do not conflict with the organization and structure of such department, division, agency or board as set forth in the administrative code of such county; "Local utility" means any sewerage authority created pursuant to the "sewerage authorities law," P.L.1946, c.138 (C.40:14A-1 et seq.); any utilities authority created pursuant to the "municipal and county utilities authorities law," P.L.1957, c.183 (C.40:14B-1 et seq.); or any utility, authority, commission, special district or other corporate entity not regulated by the Board of Regulatory Commissioners under Title 48 of the Revised Statutes that provides gas, electricity, heat, power, water or sewer service to a municipality or the residents thereof; "Official county map" means the map, with changes and additions thereto, adopted and established, from time to time, by resolution of the board of chosen freeholders of the county pursuant to R.S. 40:27-5; "Site plan" means a plan of an existing lot or plot or a subdivided lot on which is shown topography, location of all existing and proposed buildings, structures, drainage facilities, roads, rights-of-way, easements, parking areas, together with any other information required by and at a scale specified by a site plan review and approval resolution adopted by the board of chosen freeholders pursuant to this act; "Subdivision"  means the division of a lot, tract, or parcel of land into two or more lots, tracts, parcels or other divisions of land for sale or development.  The following shall not be considered subdivisions within the meaning of this act, if no new streets are created:  (1) divisions of land found by the planning board or subdivision committee thereof appointed by the chairman to be for agricultural purposes where all resulting parcels are [5] five acres or larger in size, (2) divisions of property by testamentary or intestate provisions, (3) divisions of property upon court order, including but not limited to judgments of foreclosure, (4) consolidation of existing lots by deed or other recorded instrument and (5) the conveyance of one or more adjoining lots, tracts or parcels of land, owned by the same person or persons and all of which are found and certified by the administrative officer to conform to the requirements of the municipal development regulations and are shown and designated as separate lots, tracts or parcels on the tax map or atlas of the municipality.  The term "subdivision" shall also include the term "resubdivision." "Subdivision applications" means the application for approval of a subdivision pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law" (P.L.1975, c.291; C.40:55D-1 et seq.) or an application for approval of a planned unit development pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law" (P.L.1975, c.291; C.40:55D-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.1979, c.216, s.27) 2.    (New section)  Before the expenditure of any public funds incidental to the location, character, or extent of a development proposal submitted by a local utility, the local utility shall refer the action involving the development proposal to the county planning board for review and recommendation in conjunction with the county master plan.  The local utility may take action on the development proposal upon receipt of the county planning boards recommendations or 45 days following the referral of the action without receiving any recommendation from the county planning board. 3.    Section 22 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-31) is amended to read as follows: 22.  a.  Whenever the planning board shall have adopted any portion of the master plan, the governing body or other public agency having jurisdiction over the subject matter, before taking action necessitating the expenditure of any public funds, incidental to the location, character, or extent of such project, shall refer the action involving such specific project to the planning board for review and recommendation in conjunction with such master plan and shall not act thereon, without such recommendation or until 45 days have elapsed after such reference without receiving such recommendation.  This requirement shall apply to action by a housing, parking, highway, special district, or other authority, redevelopment agency, school board or other similar public agency, State, county or municipal, or to action by a local utility.  In addition, this requirement shall apply to any public entity taking any action to permit the location, erection, use or maintenance of an outdoor advertising sign required to be permitted pursuant to P.L.1991, c.413 (C.27:5-5 et seq.). b.    The planning board shall review and issue findings concerning any long-range facilities plan submitted to the board pursuant to the "Educational Facilities Construction and Financing Act," P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.), for the purpose of review of the extent to which the long-range facilities plan is informed by, and consistent with, at least the land use plan element and the housing element contained within the municipal master plan adopted pursuant to section 19 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-28) and such other elements of the municipal master plan as the planning board deems necessary to determine whether the prospective sites for school facilities contained in the long-range facilities plan promote more effective and efficient coordination of school construction with the development efforts of the municipality.  The planning board shall devote at least one full meeting of the board to presentation and review of the long-range facilities plan prior to adoption of a resolution setting forth the board's findings. (cf: P.L.2004, c.42, s.7) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.